Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.010

Report of personal representative—Contents—Interim reports.

Not less frequently than annually from the date of qualification, unless a final report has theretofore been rendered, the personal representative shall make, verify by his or her oath, and file with the clerk of the court a report of the affairs of the estate. Such report shall contain a statement of the claims filed and allowed and all those rejected, and if it be necessary to sell, mortgage, lease, or exchange any property for the purpose of paying debts or settling any obligations against the estate or expenses of administration or allowance to the family, he or she may in such report set out the facts showing such necessity and ask for such sale, mortgage, lease, or exchange; such report shall likewise state the amount of property, real and personal, which has come into his or her hands, and give a detailed statement of all sums collected by him or her, and of all sums paid out, and it shall state such other things and matters as may be proper or necessary to give the court full information regarding any transactions by him or her done or which should be done. Such personal representative may at any time, however, make, verify, and file any reports which in his or her judgment would be proper or which the court may order to be made.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2061; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.010. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 159; RRS s 1529; prior: Code 1881 s 1544; 1854 p 296 s 167.]